Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.310

General penalty.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who violates any provisions or requirements of this chapter or rules adopted hereunder is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) A second or subsequent offense is a gross misdemeanor. Any offense committed more than five years after a previous conviction shall be considered a first offense.

[ 2003 c 53 s 118; 1967 c 177 s 16; 1961 c 249 s 34.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.